Utah statutes.
17-53-222.   Tax for exhibits encouraging trade.

A county legislative body may levy a special tax on the taxable property within the county for the purpose of creating a fund to be used for collecting, preparing, and maintaining an exhibit of the products and industries of the county at any domestic or foreign exposition, fair, or livestock show for the purpose of encouraging immigration and increasing trade in the products of the state and for the purpose of maintaining, conducting, and furnishing facilities for livestock or other exhibitions or for the purpose of promoting and making water surveys, collecting data relating to the supply, distribution and use of water or the necessity for drainage or other reclamation work and the compilation of data or information to encourage the conservation of water for the reclamation of lands within the county or counties of the state either by the county or through the instrumentality of a corporation not for pecuniary profit, organized for that purpose.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

